District of Columbia statutes.
29-1301.04

Formation of benefit corporations.

A benefit corporation must be formed in accordance with Chapter 3 of this title, but its articles of incorporation must also state that it is a benefit corporation.

May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-305, § 2(b), 60 DCR 2735